New Mexico, session 2026, HB191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five hundred thirty thousand dollars ($530,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to contract for services with a lesbian-, gay-, bisexual-, transgender- and queer-focused education organization to develop a plan to increase and improve lesbian-, gay-, bisexual-, transgender- and queer-inclusive curricula, educator training and rural school outreach and improve engagement and outcomes among lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and queer students and expand training and support networks uplifting lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and queer students in rural schools. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -